Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-196
Advertisement with price; declaration of quantity and identity.

Whenever a commodity is advertised in any manner with the price stated, there shall be closely and conspicuously associated with the price a declaration of the quantity and the identity of the commodity offered for that price. If a dual declaration is required, only the declaration that sets forth the quantity in terms of the smaller unit of measurement need appear in the advertisement.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 25.